Massachusetts, session 194th, S444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The third paragraph of section 1D of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 50, after the second sentence, the
following sentence:- The standards shall provide for instruction in: (i) tribal history and current
issues of the Aquinnah Wampanoag, Mashpee Wampanoag and other Wampanoag tribes, the
Massachusett, the Nipmuc and other Native American tribes that exist within Massachusetts; (ii)
information about tribes and confederacies that have historic ties to Massachusetts, such as the
Wabanaki Confederacy; (iii) tribal history of Native Americans throughout the United States;
(iv) tribal sovereignty and governance, treaty rights, genocide, Native American cultures,
languages and socioeconomic experiences; and (v) ongoing issues common to contemporary
of 2

Native Americans throughout Massachusetts; provided, that the board shall consult with tribal
nations in developing these standards.
of 2